Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3609
Minor traffic violations; applicability.

Sections 29-3605 to 29-3609 shall not apply to programs of pretrial diversion for offenses other than minor traffic violations.

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 9.